Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB336.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 61.691 to the contrary and
subject to limitations established by this section, there is hereby appropriated General
Fund moneys in the amount of $224,000,000 in fiscal year 2025-2026 from the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund Account established by KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority to be applied to the Kentucky Employees Retirement Fund of the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System established by KRS 61.515 to prefund in fiscal year 2025-
2026 and effective July 1, 2025, a two percent increase in the monthly retirement
allowances paid from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System to each recipient for
service in a nonhazardous position.
Section 2. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 61.691 to the contrary and
subject to limitations established by this section, there is hereby appropriated General
Fund moneys in the amount of $17,000,000 in fiscal year 2025-2026 from the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund Account established by KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority to be applied to the Kentucky Employees Retirement Fund of the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System established by KRS 61.515 to prefund in fiscal year 2025-
2026 and effective July 1, 2025, a two percent increase in the monthly retirement
allowances paid from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System to each recipient for
service in a hazardous position as provided in KRS 61.592.
Section 3. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 61.691 to the contrary and
subject to limitations established by this section, there is hereby appropriated General
Fund moneys in the amount of $16,000,000 in fiscal year 2025-2026 from the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund Account established by KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority to be applied to the State Police Retirement Fund of the State Police
Retirement System established by KRS 16.510 to prefund in fiscal year 2025-2026 and
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/31/2025 8:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1370
effective July 1, 2025, a two percent increase in the monthly retirement allowances paid
from the State Police Retirement System to each recipient.
Section 4. Whereas retired members and beneficiaries of the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System and the State Police Retirement System have not received
a cost-of-living adjustment to their retirement allowances since fiscal year 2011-2012, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/31/2025 8:29 AM Jacketed